Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-6-112 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “fluoride” means a chemical


compound that contains the fluoride ion and is used in fluoridation,


including:


1. Fluorosilicic acid;


2. Sodium fluorosilicate; and


3. Sodium fluoride.


B. 1. No political subdivision of this state shall enact or


enforce an ordinance that requires or permits the introduction or

Req. No. 2335 Page 1


depositing of fluoride or any chemical compound containing fluoride


into water in, or water that will be introduced into, a public water


supply.


2. No public or private business operating within this state


shall introduce or deposit fluoride into water in, or water that


will be introduced into, a public water supply.


C. The Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate


rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2335 CN 1/11/2026 9:38:11 AM





















Req. No. 2335 Page 2